Virginia statutes. Title 59.1. Trade and Commerce.
Chapter 22.1. The Virginia Economic Development Revolving Fund.

§§ 59.1-284.1 through 59.1-284.6.

Repealed by Acts 2005, c. 624, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Repealed § 59.1-284.5 was previously repealed by Acts 1995, c. 128.

Acts 2005, c. 624, cl. 3, provides: “That the Secretary of Commerce and Trade is hereby authorized to approve the transfer of the assets and associated records of the Virginia Economic Development Revolving Fund established under the provisions of Chapter
22.1 (§ 59.1-284.1 et seq.) of Title 59.1 of the Code of Virginia, from the Small Business Financing Authority to an eligible qualifying community development financial institution (“CDFI”). An eligible qualifying CDFI shall be a community
development bank or community development credit union that the Secretary of Commerce and Trade finds is (i) established to conduct business legally within the Commonwealth; (ii) subject to oversight by federal or state financial institution
or insurance regulatory agencies, as appropriate; and (iii) eligible for certification by the U.S. Department of Treasury as a community development financial institution. The transferred funds shall be used for the purpose of providing
a portion of the initial capitalization of the community development bank or community development credit union that is designated as the eligible qualifying CDFI. The community development bank or community development credit union
is intended to be a source of targeted lending and investment with the capacity to provide a high degree of leveraging for economic development and housing activities within distressed communities throughout the Commonwealth. These
activities may include mortgage financing for first-time buyers, financing for needed community facilities, commercial loans and investments to start or expand small businesses, loans to rehabilitate rental housing, and financial services
needed by low-income households and local businesses. The CDFI may also provide services that help ensure that credit is used effectively, such as technical assistance to small businesses and credit counseling to consumers.”

Acts 2005, c. 624, cl. 4, provides: “That on or before December 1, 2005, the Secretary of Commerce and Trade shall report to the General Assembly on the implementation of this act.”